Alaska, session 34, HB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 06 to read: 07 SHORT TITLE. This Act may be known as the Student Fee Transparency Act. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 14.40.170 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 09 (c) Before the Board of Regents imposes a new mandatory fee or increases an 10 existing mandatory fee under (b)(3) of this section, the board shall provide, by 11 electronic mail, to enrolled students a notice that specifies the amount of the new fee 12 or fee increase, the reason for the new fee or fee increase, and the purpose for which 13 the university will use the revenue generated by the new fee or fee increase. When 14 practicable, the Board of Regents shall provide the notice required under this 15 subsection at least 30 days before the new mandatory fee or fee increase is imposed. In 01 this subsection, "mandatory fee" means a fee assessed either to all enrolled students or 02 to all enrolled students at a specific campus, excluding a course fee, a matriculation 03 fee, a parking permit fee, or other fee as determined by the Board of Regents in policy. 04 * Sec. 3. AS 14.40 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 14.40.252. Itemized billing statement. The University of Alaska shall 06 provide to each student enrolled in the university a billing statement that itemizes the 07 tuition and fees charged to the student. 08 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.